dev/ortho/ara-cyr.twol
Alphabet

ا:а 
ە:ә 
ب:б 
پ:п 
ت:т 
ج:җ 
چ:ч 
خ:х 
د:д 
ر:р 
ز:з 
ژ:ж 
س:с 
ش:ш 
غ:ғ 
ف:ф 
ق:қ 
ك:к 
گ:г 
ڭ:ң 
ل:л 
م:м 
ن:н 
ھ:һ 
و:о 
ۇ:у 
ۆ:ө 
ۈ:ү 
ۋ:в 
ې:е 
ى:и 
ي:й 
ک:к 
ئ:0
ا:я
ۇ:ю

ا:А 
ە:Ә 
ب:Б 
پ:П 
ت:Т 
ج:Җ 
چ:Ч 
خ:Х 
د:Д 
ر:Р 
ز:З 
ژ:Ж 
س:С 
ش:Ш 
غ:Ғ 
ف:Ф 
ق:Қ 
ك:К 
گ:Г 
ڭ:Ң 
ل:Л 
م:М 
ن:Н 
ھ:Һ 
و:О 
ۇ:У 
ۆ:Ө 
ۈ:Ү 
ۋ:В 
ې:Е 
ى:И 
ي:Й 
ک:К 
ا:Я
ۇ:Ю


;

Sets

Locs = а ә б п т җ ч х д р з ж с ш ғ ф қ к г ң л м н һ о у ө ү в е и й я ю ;

Caps = А Ә Б П Т Җ Ч Х Д Р З Ж С Ш Ғ Ф Қ К Г Ң Л М Н Һ О У Ө Ү В Е И Й Я Ю ;

Vows = а ә о у ө ү е и
       А Ә О У Ө Ү Е И ;


Rules

!! This rule is actually a heuristic. Most words with VV sequences have a hamza 
!! between them, but certain (mostly Mandarin?) loanwords don't: e.g., ئيۈەن
!"Mandatory hamza between vowels"
!ئ:0 <=> :Vows _ :Vows ;
!
!"Mandatory hamza word-initially before vowel"
!ئ:0 <=> .#.  _ :Vows ;

"Only capitalize word-initially"
:Caps => .#. :0* _ ;
!Sx:Sy <=> .#. _ ;
!      where
!         Sx in Locs
!         Sy in Caps
!      matched ;

"If we have yot letter mappings, has to be after ي"
Vx:Vy => ي: _ ;
!      except
!          .#. ي: _ ;
      where
          Vx in ( ا ۇ )
          Vy in ( я ю )
      matched ;

"If we have Yot letter mappings, has to be after word-initial ي"
Vx:Vy => .#. ي: _ ;
      where
          Vx in ( ا ۇ )
          Vy in ( Я Ю )
      matched ;

"If we get vowels after after non-word-initial ي, they have to be yot letters"
Vx:Vy <= ي: _ ;
      except
          .#. ي: _ ;
      where
          Vx in ( ا ۇ )
          Vy in ( я ю )
      matched ;

"Can't have non-yoticised letters after ي"
Vx:Vy /<= ي: _ ;
      where
          Vx in ( ا ۇ ا ۇ )
          Vy in ( а у А У )
      matched ;

"Vowels are never realised as yot vowels after something other than ي or at the beginning of a word"
Vx:Vy /<= \ي: _ ;
          .#. _ ;
      where
          Vx in ( ا ۇ ا ۇ )
          Vy in ( я ю Я Ю )
      matched ;



"Y deletes before yot vowels"
ي:0 <=> _ [ ا: | ۇ: ] ;

!""
!Vx:Vy <=> \ي: _ ;
